tr: Avrupa kılıç modeli/tipi: Şövalye kılıcı; Piç kılıcı (bir buçuk el); Geniş kılıç; Claymore (İskoç büyük kılıcı); Pala; Estoc; Falchion; Gladius (Roma); Uzun kılıç; Rapier; Süvari kılıcı/Saber; Scimitar; Şemşir; İnce kılıç; Spatha; Viking kılıcı; Zweihänder (büyük kılıç); Diğer
el: Μοτίβο/τύπος ευρωπαϊκού ξίφους: Ιπποτικό ξίφος; Νόθο ξίφος (ενάμισι χεριού); Πλατύσπαθο; Κλέιμορ (σκωτσέζικο μεγάλο ξίφος); Ναυτική σπάθη; Εστόκ; Φάλτσιον; Gladius (ρωμαϊκό); Μακρύ ξίφος; Ραπιέρα; Σπάθη; Σιμιτάρι; Σαμσίρ; Μικρό ξίφος; Σπάθα; Σπαθί των Βίκινγκ; Τσβάιχαντερ (μεγάλο ξίφος); Άλλο
th: รูปแบบ/ประเภทดาบยุโรป: ดาบอาร์มมิ่ง; ดาบบาสตาร์ด (ดาบมือครึ่ง); ดาบบรอดซอร์ด; ดาบเคลย์มอร์ (ดาบใหญ่สกอตแลนด์); ดาบคัตลาส; ดาบเอสต็อก; ดาบฟัลเชียน; ดาบกลาดิอุส (โรมัน); ดาบยาว; ดาบเรเปียร์; ดาบเซเบอร์; ดาบสคิมิตาร์; ดาบแชมเชียร์; ดาบสมอลซอร์ด; ดาบสปาธา; ดาบไวกิ้ง; ดาบซไวฮันเดอร์ (ดาบใหญ่); อื่นๆ
cs: Evropský vzor/typ meče: Rytířský meč; Bastard (jedenapůlruční meč); Široký meč; Claymore (skotský obouruční meč); Tesák (cutlass); Estoc (končíř); Falchion; Gladius (římský); Dlouhý meč; Rapír; Šavle; Scimitar; Šamšír; Kordík; Spatha; Vikinský meč; Zweihänder (obouruční meč); Ostatní
nl: Europees zwaard model/type: Ridderswaard; Bastaardzwaard (anderhalfhandig); Breedzwaard; Claymore (Schots slagzwaard); Houwdegen; Estoc; Falchion; Gladius (Romeins); Langzwaard; Rapier; Sabel; Kromzwaard; Shamshir; Degen; Spatha; Vikingzwaard; Zweihänder (slagzwaard); Overig
pt-BR: Padrão/tipo de espada europeia: Espada de armar; Espada bastarda (uma mão e meia); Espada larga; Claymore (espada grande escocesa); Alfanje; Estoque; Bracamarte; Gládio (romano); Espada longa; Rapieira; Sabre; Cimitarra; Shamshir; Espadim; Espata; Espada viking; Zweihänder (espada grande); Outro
de: Muster/Typ des europäischen Schwerts: Ritterschwert; Bastardschwert (Anderthalbhänder); Breitschwert; Claymore (schottisches Großschwert); Entermesser; Estoc (Panzerstecher); Falchion; Gladius (römisch); Langschwert; Rapier; Säbel; Krummsäbel; Schamschir; Galanteriedegen; Spatha; Wikingerschwert; Zweihänder (Großschwert); Sonstige
nb: Europeisk sverdmønster/-type: Riddersverd; Bastardsverd (halvannenhånds); Bredsverd; Claymore (skotsk tohendingssverd); Huggert; Estoc; Falchion; Gladius (romersk); Langsverd; Rapir; Sabel; Krumsabel; Shamshir; Kårde; Spatha; Vikingsverd; Zweihänder (tohendingssverd); Annet
lt-LT: Europietiško kalavijo tipas: Vienrankis kalavijas; Pusantrarankis kalavijas (bastardas); Platusis kalavijas; Kleimoras (škotiškas didysis kalavijas); Abordažinis kardas; Estokas; Falčionas; Gladijus (romėnų); Ilgasis kalavijas; Rapyra; Kardas; Scimitaras; Šamširas; Špaga; Spata; Vikingų kalavijas; Cveihanderis (didysis kalavijas); Kita
ko: 유럽 검의 양식/유형: 아밍 소드; 바스타드 소드(핸드 앤 어 하프); 브로드소드; 클레이모어(스코틀랜드 대검); 커틀러스; 에스토크; 펄션; 글라디우스(로마); 롱소드; 레이피어; 세이버; 시미터; 샴쉬르; 스몰소드; 스파타; 바이킹 소드; 츠바이헨더(대검); 기타
pl: Wzór/typ miecza europejskiego: Miecz rycerski; Miecz bękartowski (półtoraręczny); Pałasz; Claymore (szkocki miecz dwuręczny); Kordelas; Koncerz; Tasak bojowy; Gladius (rzymski); Długi miecz; Rapier; Szabla; Sejmitar; Szamszir; Szpada; Spatha; Miecz wikiński; Zweihänder (miecz dwuręczny); Inne
vi: Mẫu/kiểu kiếm châu Âu: Kiếm Arming; Kiếm Bastard (loại một tay rưỡi); Kiếm Broadsword; Kiếm Claymore (đại kiếm Scotland); Kiếm Cutlass; Kiếm Estoc; Kiếm Falchion; Kiếm Gladius (La Mã); Trường kiếm; Kiếm Rapier; Kiếm Sabre; Kiếm Scimitar; Kiếm Shamshir; Kiếm nhỏ; Kiếm Spatha; Kiếm Viking; Kiếm Zweihänder (đại kiếm); Khác
es: Diseño o tipo de espada europea: Espada de armar; Espada bastarda (de mano y media); Espada ancha; Claymore (gran espada escocesa); Alfanje; Estoque; Bracamante; Gladius (romana); Espada larga; Espada ropera; Sable; Cimitarra; Shamshir; Espadín; Spatha; Espada vikinga; Zweihänder (gran espada); Otro
ru: Паттерн или тип европейского меча: Рыцарский меч; Полутораручный меч (бастард); Палаш; Клеймор (шотландский двуручный меч); Абордажная сабля; Эсток; Фальшион; Гладиус (римский); Длинный меч; Рапира; Сабля; Скимитар; Шамшир; Камзольная шпага; Спата; Меч викингов; Цвайхандер (двуручный меч); Другое
it: Modelli/tipologie di spade europee: Spada d'armi; Spada bastarda (a una mano e mezza); Broadsword; Claymore (spadone scozzese); Sciabola d'arrembaggio; Stocco; Falcione; Gladio (romano); Spada lunga; Spada da striscia; Sciabola; Scimitarra; Shamshir; Spadino; Spatha; Spada vichinga; Zweihänder (spadone); Altro
fr: Modèle ou type d’épée européenne: Épée d’armes; Épée bâtarde (à une main et demie); Épée large; Claymore (grande épée écossaise); Coutelas; Estoc; Fauchon; Glaive (romain); Épée longue; Rapière; Sabre; Cimeterre; Shamshir; Épée de cour; Spatha; Épée viking; Zweihänder (grande épée); Autre
sl-SI: Vzorčna zasnova/vrsta evropskega meča: Enoročni meč; Meč poldoročnik (bastardni meč); Široki meč; Claymore (škotski veliki meč); Mornariški meč; Estoc (prebodni meč); Falchion; Gladius (rimski); Dolgi meč; Rapir; Sablja; Scimitar (kriva sablja); Šamšir; Mali meč; Spata; Vikinški meč; Zweihänder (dvoročni meč); Drugo
sv: Europeiskt svärdmönster/typ: Riddarsvärd; Bastardsvärd (halvannanhandssvärd); Bredsvärd; Claymore (skotskt tvåhandssvärd); Huggare; Estoc; Falchion; Gladius (romerskt); Långsvärd; Värja; Sabel; Kroksabel; Shamshir; Galanterivärja; Spatha; Vikingasvärd; Zweihänder (tvåhandssvärd); Övrigt
fi: Eurooppalaisen miekan malli/tyyppi: Yhden käden miekka; Äpärämiekka (puolentoista käden miekka); Leveämiekka; Claymore (skotlantilainen kahden käden miekka); Merimiesmiekka; Estoc-pistomiekka; Falchion; Gladius (roomalainen); Pitkämiekka; Rapiiri; Sapeli; Käyräsapeli; Shamshir; Pukumiekka; Spatha; Viikinkimiekka; Zweihänder (kahden käden miekka); Muu
en: European sword pattern/type: Arming sword; Bastard sword (hand-and-a-half); Broadsword; Claymore (Scottish greatsword); Cutlass; Estoc; Falchion; Gladius (Roman); Longsword; Rapier; Sabre/Saber; Scimitar; Shamshir; Smallsword; Spatha; Viking sword; Zweihänder (greatsword); Other
ja: ヨーロッパの剣のパターン／タイプ: アーミングソード; バスタードソード (ハンド・アンド・ア・ハーフ); ブロードソード; クレイモア (スコットランドのグレートソード); カトラス; エストック; ファルシオン; グラディウス (ローマ); ロングソード; レイピア; サーベル/セイバー; シミター; シャムシール; スモールソード; スパタ; ヴァイキングソード; ツヴァイヘンダー (グレートソード); その他
zh-TW: 歐洲劍型/類型: 武裝劍; 混種劍 (手半劍); 闊劍; 蘇格蘭闊劍 (蘇格蘭大劍); 水手刀; 刺甲劍; 闊刃彎刀; 短劍 (羅馬); 長劍; 迅捷劍; 軍刀; 彎刀; 波斯彎刀; 小劍; 斯帕達長劍; 維京劍; 雙手巨劍 (大劍); 其他
zh-CN: 欧洲剑形制/类型: 武装剑; 混种剑（手半剑）; 阔剑; 克莱默剑（苏格兰大剑）; 水手弯刀; 穿甲剑; 砍剑; 短剑（罗马）; 长剑; 迅捷剑; 军刀/马刀; 弯刀; 舍施尔弯刀; 小剑; 斯帕达剑; 维京剑; 双手剑（大剑）; 其他
da: Europæisk sværdmønster/type: Riddersværd; Bastardsværd (halvandenhånds); Bredsværd; Claymore (skotsk tohåndssværd); Huggert; Estoc; Falchion; Gladius (romersk); Langsværd; Rapier; Sabel; Krumsabel; Shamshir; Kårde; Spatha; Vikingesværd; Zweihänder (tohåndssværd); Andet
hr-HR: Uzorak/vrsta europskog mača: Jednoručni mač; Mač kopile (dvoručni i pol mač); Široki mač; Claymore (škotski veliki mač); Kratki mornarički mač (tesak); Estoc; Falchion; Gladij (rimski); Dugi mač; Rapir; Sablja; Scimitar; Šamšir; Mali mač; Spata; Vikinški mač; Zweihänder (veliki mač); Ostalo
sk-SK: Európsky vzor/typ meča: Jednoručný meč; Bastard (jedenapolručný meč); Široký meč; Claymore (škótsky obojručný meč); Tesák; Končiar; Falchion; Gladius (rímsky); Dlhý meč; Rapír; Šabľa; Scimitar; Šamšir; Kord; Spatha; Vikingský meč; Zweihänder (obojručný meč); Iné
bg-BG: Европейски модел/тип меч: Рицарски меч (едноръчен); Меч копеле (меч за ръка и половина); Палаш; Клеймор (шотландски двуръчен меч); Абордажна сабя; Есток; Фалшион; Гладиус (римски); Дълъг меч; Рапира; Сабя; Скимитар; Шамшир; Шпага; Спата; Викингски меч; Цвайхендер (двуръчен меч); Други
hu: Európai kardminta/típus: Egykezes kard; Fattyúkard (másfélkezes); Széleskard; Claymore (skót kétkezes kard); Tengerészkard; Estoc (páncéltörő kard); Falchion; Gladius (római); Hosszúkard; Rapír; Szablya; Scimitar; Samsír; Kiskard (udvari kard); Spatha; Viking kard; Zweihänder (kétkezes kard); Egyéb
ro-RO: Model/tip de sabie europeană: Spadă de armare; Spadă bastardă (de o mână și jumătate); Spadă lată; Claymore (spadă scoțiană mare); Sabie de abordaj; Estoc; Falchion; Gladius (roman); Spadă lungă; Rapieră; Sabie; Cimitar; Shamshir; Spadă de curte; Spatha; Spadă vikingă; Zweihänder (spadă mare); Altele
pt-PT: Padrão/tipo de espada europeia: Espada de armar; Espada bastarda (mão e meia); Espada larga; Claymore (espada grande escocesa); Sabre de abordagem; Estoque; Alfange; Gládio (romano); Espada longa; Rapieira; Sabre; Cimitarra; Shamshir; Espadim; Espata; Espada viking; Zweihänder (espada grande); Outro